Massachusetts, session 194th, H3667.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding at the end of line 294 after the word “and” the following words:
“no commuter rail expansion shall be planned without approval of the governing body of the
communities the expansion will travel through."
of 1